lexc/noun/enhubokor.lexc
LEXICON Poss
+Tem:^+cTem^kor             #;    ! kor
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§JJ§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§JJ§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JJ§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JJ§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JJ§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JJ§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JJ§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JJ§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                            Gen2;

LEXICON Fam
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen3;
                       Case2;

LEXICON Gen
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
!                       Case2;

LEXICON Gen2

+Gens:^+cGens^é        Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case2;

! This is the secret to have bokor+Noun[gcat]+Fam+Acc[lfea]
LEXICON Gen3
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case;  !This one!!!

LEXICON Case
+Abl:^+cAbl^t§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t     #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§     #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^b§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^b§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l     #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^kor             #;    ! kor

LEXICON Case2
+Abl:^+cAbl^t§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t  ! kikapcsolás?
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§     #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^b§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^b§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l     #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^kor             #;    ! kor

LEXICON AddNountej
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Casetej;

LEXICON Casetej
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t

LEXICON AddNounbajusz
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possbajusz;

LEXICON Possbajusz
+Tem:^+cTem^kor             #;    ! kor
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként, önként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fambajusz;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fambajusz;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§Jnull§§AE1§   Fambajusz;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fambajusz;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fambajusz;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§Jnull§§UUE1§k   Fambajusz;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§Jnull§§AE§im   Fambajusz;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§Jnull§§AE§id   Fambajusz;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§Jnull§§AE§i   Fambajusz;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§Jnull§§AE§ink   Fambajusz;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§Jnull§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fambajusz;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§Jnull§§AE§ik   Fambajusz;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
!                            Genbajusz;

LEXICON Fambajusz
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genbajusz;
                       Genbajusz;

LEXICON Genbajusz
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Casebajusz;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casebajusz;
                       Casebajusz;

LEXICON Casebajusz
+Abl:^+cAbl^t§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t     #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§     #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^b§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^b§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l     #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^kor             #;    ! kor


LEXICON AddNounakol
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possakol;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Gen;

LEXICON Possakol
+Tem:^+cTem^kor             #;    ! kor
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§JJ§§AE21§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e Gen2;
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§Jnull§§AE21§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t     #;  ! ot, et, öt, t

LEXICON AddNounAccaejaje
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     PossAccaejaje;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     FamAcc;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     GenAcc;

LEXICON PossAccaejaje
+Tem:^+cTem^kor             #;    ! kor
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§Jnull§§AE1§   FamAcc;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§Jnull§§UUE1§k   FamAcc;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§Jnull§§AE§im   FamAcc;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§Jnull§§AE§id   FamAcc;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§Jnull§§AE§i   FamAcc;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§Jnull§§AE§ink   FamAcc;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§Jnull§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   FamAcc;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§Jnull§§AE§ik   FamAcc;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§JJ§§AE1§   FamAcc;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§JJ§§UUE1§k   FamAcc;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JJ§§AE§im   FamAcc;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JJ§§AE§id   FamAcc;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JJ§§AE§i   FamAcc;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JJ§§AE§ink   FamAcc;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JJ§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   FamAcc;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JJ§§AE§ik   FamAcc;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                            Gen2Acc;
LEXICON AddNounAccae
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     PossAccae;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     FamAcc;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     GenAcc;

LEXICON PossAccae
+Tem:^+cTem^kor             #;    ! kor
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§Jnull§§AE1§   FamAcc;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§Jnull§§UUE1§k   FamAcc;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§Jnull§§AE§im   FamAcc;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§Jnull§§AE§id   FamAcc;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§Jnull§§AE§i   FamAcc;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§Jnull§§AE§ink   FamAcc;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§Jnull§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   FamAcc;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§Jnull§§AE§ik   FamAcc;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                            Gen2Acc;

LEXICON Noun
acélököl AddNounakol;
adópokol AddNounakol;
agyagbányagödör AddNounAccaejaje;
akol AddNounakol;
aranypehely AddNountej;
atomtitok AddNounAccaejaje;
bajusz AddNounAccae;
bajusz AddNounbajusz;
bakapehely AddNountej;
bikaakol AddNounakol;
birkaakol AddNounakol;
bolhafészek AddNounAccaejaje;
borpokol AddNounakol;
bronzököl AddNounakol;
buckabagoly AddNountej;
bunkóököl AddNounakol;
bányászököl AddNounakol;
bárányakol AddNounakol;
bástyaárok AddNounAccaejaje;
bélpokol AddNounakol;
börtönfogoly AddNountej;
börtönpokol AddNounakol;
bőrbajusz AddNounAccae;
bőrbajusz AddNounbajusz;
csappantyúfészek AddNounAccaejaje;
csecsemőököl AddNounakol;
csemegebajusz AddNounAccae;
csemegebajusz AddNounbajusz;
cserefogoly AddNountej;
csikóakol AddNounakol;
csokoládékehely AddNountej;
csupor AddNounAccaejaje;
császárfogoly AddNountej;
dinamitököl AddNounakol;
dolomitfészek AddNounAccaejaje;
drogpokol AddNounakol;
energiaököl AddNounakol;
erdészgyomor AddNounAccaejaje;
erőököl AddNounakol;
fagylaltkehely AddNountej;
favágóököl AddNounakol;
fejtükör AddNounAccaejaje;
fogoly AddNountej;
fotonburok AddNounAccaejaje;
fájdalompokol AddNounakol;
félököl AddNounakol;
férfifogoly AddNountej;
férfiököl AddNounakol;
fókabajusz AddNounAccae;
fókabajusz AddNounbajusz;
függőmeder AddNounAccaejaje;
gabonapehely AddNountej;
gigaököl AddNounakol;
gilisztacukor AddNounAccaejaje;
gulyaakol AddNounakol;
gyapjúpehely AddNountej;
gyerekököl AddNounakol;
gyermekpokol AddNounakol;
gyártelek AddNounAccaejaje;
gyászbagoly AddNountej;
gyémántököl AddNounakol;
gyümölcskehely AddNountej;
hadifogoly AddNountej;
hadvezérszobor AddNounAccaejaje;
harcsabajusz AddNounAccae;
harcsabajusz AddNounbajusz;
hattyúpehely AddNountej;
hentesszatyor AddNounAccaejaje;
hitlerbajusz AddNounAccae;
hitlerbajusz AddNounbajusz;
homokököl AddNounakol;
huszárbajusz AddNounAccae;
huszárbajusz AddNounbajusz;
háncsszatyor AddNounAccaejaje;
hóbagoly AddNountej;
hűségkehely AddNountej;
időhurok AddNounAccaejaje;
jelzálogteher AddNounAccaejaje;
juhászbajusz AddNounAccae;
juhászbajusz AddNounbajusz;
jégkehely AddNountej;
jégpokol AddNounakol;
kalapácsököl AddNounakol;
kalózszobor AddNounAccaejaje;
kardbajusz AddNounAccae;
kardbajusz AddNounbajusz;
karvalybagoly AddNountej;
kefebajusz AddNounAccae;
kefebajusz AddNounbajusz;
kerékszobor AddNounAccaejaje;
koktélkehely AddNountej;
koronatitok AddNounAccaejaje;
kovapehely AddNountej;
kukoricabajusz AddNounAccae;
kukoricabajusz AddNounbajusz;
kávécukor AddNounAccaejaje;
kókuszkehely AddNountej;
köldököl AddNounakol;
köszönőszobor AddNounAccaejaje;
közfogoly AddNountej;
leopárdmancsököl AddNounakol;
levélburok AddNounAccaejaje;
libapehely AddNountej;
lángkehely AddNountej;
lávapokol AddNounakol;
lótuszvirágkehely AddNountej;
lövőárok AddNounAccaejaje;
macskabajusz AddNounAccae;
macskabajusz AddNounbajusz;
magzatpehely AddNountej;
majompokol AddNounakol;
mellékhurok AddNounAccaejaje;
misekehely AddNountej;
munkahelysarok AddNounAccaejaje;
munkásököl AddNounakol;
ménesakol AddNounakol;
méregkehely AddNountej;
műbajusz AddNounAccae;
műbajusz AddNounbajusz;
műbögöly AddNounAccaejaje;
narancskehely AddNountej;
nyusztkölyök AddNounAccaejaje;
oroszlántorok AddNounAccaejaje;
ostyakehely AddNountej;
pamacsbajusz AddNounAccae;
pamacsbajusz AddNounbajusz;
patkányfészek AddNounAccaejaje;
pehely AddNountej;
pemzlibajusz AddNounAccae;
pemzlibajusz AddNounbajusz;
pocsétanyirok AddNounAccaejaje;
pokol AddNounakol;
purgatóriumpehely AddNountej;
páralélek AddNounAccaejaje;
pártököl AddNounakol;
retek AddNounAccaejaje;
rozmárbajusz AddNounAccae;
rozmárbajusz AddNounbajusz;
rozspehely AddNountej;
rózsakehely AddNountej;
sajtómocsok AddNounAccaejaje;
sertebajusz AddNounAccae;
sertebajusz AddNounbajusz;
strandszatyor AddNounAccaejaje;
státuszfogoly AddNountej;
szakállbajusz AddNounAccae;
szakállbajusz AddNounbajusz;
szarvasbajusz AddNounAccae;
szarvasbajusz AddNounbajusz;
szezámpehely AddNountej;
szomszédtelek AddNounAccaejaje;
szójapehely AddNountej;
sárgadinnyekehely AddNountej;
sódergödör AddNounAccaejaje;
sörtebajusz AddNounAccae;
sörtebajusz AddNounbajusz;
tegez AddNounAccae;
tejbajusz AddNounAccae;
tejbajusz AddNounbajusz;
tejpokol AddNounakol;
tigrisbajusz AddNounAccae;
tigrisbajusz AddNounbajusz;
trágyalégödör AddNounAccaejaje;
tűzpokol AddNounakol;
uhubagoly AddNountej;
vadétek AddNounAccaejaje;
vaskézököl AddNounakol;
vastagbajusz AddNounAccae;
vastagbajusz AddNounbajusz;
villámököl AddNounakol;
vándorkehely AddNountej;
vászontükör AddNounAccaejaje;
zajpokol AddNounakol;
álbajusz AddNounAccae;
álbajusz AddNounbajusz;
áldozókehely AddNountej;
államtitok AddNounAccaejaje;
ököl AddNounakol;
öszvérbagoly AddNountej;
üvegkehely AddNounAccaejaje;
őrmesterbajusz AddNounAccae;
őrmesterbajusz AddNounbajusz;
